Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1001.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of economic security; older individuals who are blind program The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of economic security for the older individuals who are blind program.